Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2349
Metropolitan utilities district funds; custodian of securities; withdrawal of funds.

A metropolitan utilities district shall be the custodian of securities in which funds of such district are invested, including the securities of such district itself. Except for funds deposited in a depository in strict accordance with all the requirements of sections 77-2342 to 77-2349, the district shall be liable for the accounting, safekeeping, and repayment of all funds received by the district. Any such district may at any time withdraw any funds on deposit in a depository or any funds in the district's possession and custody and invest such funds in such securities as may be designated by formal resolution of the governing body of such district.

Laws 1933, c. 95, § 4, p. 379;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2533;

R.S.1943, § 77-2349;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 61;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 77;

Laws 2001, LB 177, § 9.